Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB323.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II of Title 64 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 17KEYSTONE NATIONAL FINANCE AUTHORITYSubchapterA. General ProvisionsB. Structure and PowersC. BondsSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.1701. Scope of chapter.123456789101112131415161718 1702. Findings and declaration of policy.1703. Definitions.§ 1701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Keystone National Finance Authority.§ 1702. Findings and declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Activities which lead to the creation and retention of jobs in this Commonwealth and throughout the United States, the establishment of economically viable communities, the reuse of abandoned industrial, commercial and other previously utilized sites and the investment of private capital in enterprises improve the health, safety and general welfare of the people of this Commonwealth and the United States by increasing employment, revitalizing communities by reducing, eliminating and preventing blight and providing a source of additional revenue to the Commonwealth.(2) Many existing industrial, commercial and other economic activities throughout this Commonwealth and the United States could become more competitive and could expand more rapidly if additional means of financing were available. Additional activities could be attracted to this Commonwealth and other states if additional means of financing were available to acquire, construct, rehabilitate and expand facilities. Financing for cost-saving activities related to buildings, plants, machinery and equipment and other facilities would further the purposes specified under this paragraph.(3) A minimum level of unemployment and a maximum level of business opportunity can best be provided by the 20250SB0323PN1620 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promotion, attraction, stimulation, rehabilitation and revitalization of industrial, commercial, technological, tourist, agricultural and other economic activities in this Commonwealth and throughout the United States.(4) Industrial, commercial and residential facilities should be promoted by the financing of the facilities which will eliminate blight or otherwise improve an area for industrial, commercial or other economic activity.(5) Housing and affordable housing are scarce in many areas of the nation and could be advanced by mixed-use and transit-oriented development. Transit expansion, including passenger rail expansion, throughout the nation will create opportunities for the growth of adjacent commercial, residential and mixed-use development in nearby communities.(6) To further encourage economic development and efficiency within this Commonwealth and the United States by providing basic services and facilities, it is necessary to provide additional or alternative means of financing infrastructure facilities, transportation systems, industrial parks, energy conversion facilities, facilities for the furnishing of energy, water and telecommunications, facilities for the collection or treatment of wastewater and storm water, tourism, parking facilities, health care facilities and other basic service and related facilities which are conducive to economic activity within this Commonwealth and the United States and which are consistent with the purposes of this chapter.(7) It is the policy of this Commonwealth to promote the health, safety, employment, business opportunities, economic activity and general welfare of the people by establishing an 20250SB0323PN1620 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority to exist and operate as a public instrumentality of the Commonwealth, which is not intended to compete with any Commonwealth agency or any other authority created under the laws of this Commonwealth.§ 1703. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrator." The person contracted by the authority under section 1713(a)(10) (relating to powers) to operate the authority, which person or the leadership of the person shall be a registered municipal advisor that has significant experience operating a governmental entity or authority that issues bonds for projects throughout the United States."Authority." The Keystone National Finance Authority established in section 1711 (relating to authority)."Board." The board of the authority established in section 1712 (relating to board)."Bonds." Bonds, notes, instruments, refunding notes and bonds and other evidences of indebtedness or obligations which the authority is authorized to issue under this chapter."Commonwealth agency." An agency, authority or other instrumentality of the Commonwealth."Conduit borrower." The borrower of the proceeds of the bonds issued by the authority."Conduit financing." The financing of the costs of a project in which the authority is only obligated to repay bonds from revenues received from a conduit borrower."Conduit revenue bonds." Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness of the authority.20250SB0323PN1620 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cost of the project" or "cost." Any of the following:(1) Costs and expenses of acquisition of interests in land, infrastructure, buildings, structures, equipment, furnishings, fixtures and other tangible or intangible property, which comprise the project.(2) Costs and expenses of construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, expansion, extension, improvement, installation, rehabilitation, renovation or repair of the buildings, structures and equipment, which comprise the project.(3) Costs and expenses of demolishing, removing or relocating buildings or structures on lands acquired or to be acquired and the expense of acquiring land to which the buildings or structures may be moved or relocated.(4) Costs and expenses of preparing land for development.(5) Costs and expenses of engineering services, financial services, accounting services and legal services, plans, specifications, studies and surveys necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project.(6) Working capital or other capital needs related to the project.(7) Other costs and expenses deemed necessary by the authority."Finance." Providing funding to pay for costs of a project."Government agency." The following:(1) A State agency.(2) The Unified Judicial System and its courts, officers and agencies.20250SB0323PN1620 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The General Assembly or its officers and agencies.(4) A political subdivision.(5) A municipal authority or other local authority.(6) A local, regional or metropolitan transportation authority.(7) A board, commission or other agency or instrumentality of a political subdivision, a municipal authority or other local authority."Independent agency." A board, commission or other agency or officer of the Commonwealth which is not subject to the policy, supervision and control of the Governor. The term does not include a State-affiliated entity, a court or other officer or agency of the Unified Judicial System, the General Assembly and its officers and agencies, a State-related institution, a political subdivision or a local, regional or metropolitan transportation authority."Municipal authority." A public authority created under the governing laws of any state."Obligee of the authority." Any of the following:(1) A holder or owner of bonds of the authority.(2) A trustee or other fiduciary for any holder or owner of bonds of the authority.(3) A provider of a letter of credit, policy of municipal bond insurance or other credit enhancement or liquidity facility for bonds of the authority.(4) A lessor or installment seller demising property to the authority in connection with a project.(5) A provider of an interest rate exchange agreement or other agreement or arrangement authorized under section 1713(a)(28).20250SB0323PN1620 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Project." A capital improvement, purchase of receivables, property, assets, commodities, bonds or other revenue streams or related assets, working capital program or any activity that promotes economic development or opportunities within any state or territory of the United States."Project user." A person, political subdivision, municipal authority, state or other entity that owns, leases, uses or occupies all or any part of a project."Registered municipal advisor." A person that is registered as a municipal advisor under rules promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission."Tax-exempt bonds." Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, the interest on which is excludable from gross income for Federal income taxation purposes."Taxable bonds." Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, the interest on which is includable in gross income for Federal income taxation purposes.SUBCHAPTER BSTRUCTURE AND POWERSSec.1711. Authority.1712. Board.1713. Powers.§ 1711. Authority.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone National Finance Authority is established as an independent authority. The authority is an instrumentality of the Commonwealth and a body corporate and politic, with corporate succession.(b) Governance.--The authority shall be governed by the board. The powers of the authority shall be exercised by the 20250SB0323PN1620 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board.(c) Expenses.--Expenses of the authority shall be paid from assets or income of the authority. The Commonwealth shall not be responsible for funding the expenses of the authority.(d) Fiscal year.--The fiscal year of the authority shall end on June 30.(e) Audit.--(1) The accounts and books of the authority shall be audited annually by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards . (2) The authority shall, by December 31 of each year, file a copy of the audit required under paragraph (1) with the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.(f) Publication.--The authority shall annually transmit audited financial statements to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(g) Cooperation.--Executive agencies shall cooperate with and provide assistance to the authority without financial reimbursement.(h) Existence and dissolution.--The authority may be dissolved by law if all outstanding liabilities of the authority, including bonds and other contractual obligations, have been fully paid, retired, satisfied or discharged or provision has been made for payment of all outstanding liabilities of the authority, including bonds and other contractual obligations. Upon the dissolution of the authority, all money, assets and other property of the authority shall vest 20250SB0323PN1620 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the Commonwealth.(i) Procurement.--The authority shall be exempt from the provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement) relating to operations of Commonwealth agencies. The authority shall adopt policies and procedures for procurement in a manner that the board determines best balances efficiency, effectiveness and transparency, which may include delegation of certain tasks to the Department of Community and Economic Development or the Department of General Services and which may incorporate by reference elements of 62 Pa.C.S. The board shall publish the policies and procedures within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, subject to further adjustment by the board, on the authority's publicly accessible Internet website.(j) Limitation on action.--(1) If any provision of this section or section 1712 (relating to board) is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the authority shall not thereafter:(i) borrow additional money;(ii) issue additional bonds; or(iii) disburse proceeds of any issue of bonds previously authorized.(2) All provisions of outstanding bonds of the authority and all rights and remedies of obligees of the authority under this chapter shall be and shall remain valid and enforceable.(k) Administrator.--The administrator shall operate the authority. The cost of the administrator shall be payable from fees generated by the authority. Neither the Commonwealth nor the authority shall be responsible for the cost of the administrator. The following apply:20250SB0323PN1620 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The administrator shall provide administrative services and staff to the authority and the board.(2) The authority may enter into agreements with the administrator specifying the rights and obligations the parties have to each other in carrying out their respective responsibilities under and to further the intent of this chapter.(l) Applicability.--The following acts shall apply to the authority and the board relating to notice and open meetings:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).§ 1712. Board.(a) Composition.--The board shall be comprised as follows:(1) An individual with large-scale construction experience appointed by the Governor, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(2) An individual with public finance or project finance experience appointed by the Governor, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(3) An individual appointed by the State Treasurer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the State Treasurer.(4) An individual appointed by the Auditor General, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Auditor General.(5) Four legislative appointees:(i) Appointments under this paragraph shall be as 20250SB0323PN1620 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 follows:(A) One individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(B) One individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(C) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(D) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(ii) Legislative appointees shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.(iii) An individual appointed to the board under subparagraph (i) may not be a member of the General Assembly or staff of a member of the General Assembly.(6) Five appointees who shall be appointed to an initial term within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph, as follows:(i) One board member appointed by the other members of the board by a vote of a majority, whose initial term shall be two years and a term of 10 years thereafter.(ii) One board member appointed by the other members of the board by a vote of a majority, whose initial term shall be four years and a term of 10 years thereafter.(iii) One board member appointed by the other members of the board by a vote of a majority, whose initial term shall be six years and a term of 10 years thereafter.(iv) One board member appointed by the other members of the board by a vote of a majority, whose initial term shall be eight years and a term of 10 years thereafter.20250SB0323PN1620 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) One board member appointed by the other members of the board by a vote of a majority, whose initial term shall be 10 years and a term of 10 years thereafter.(b) Organization.--The Governor shall select a member of the board to serve as chairperson. The members shall select other officers from among members of the board as the board determines.(c) Meetings and proxy.--The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson. The board may hold virtual or telephonic meetings. A board member may designate a proxy to act on the board member's behalf by notifying the board in writing of the proxy.(d) Quorum.-- Two-thirds of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The consent of at least two-thirds of the members of the board, with at least four of the consenting members being appointed under subsection (a)(5), shall be necessary to take any action on behalf of the authority.(e) Compensation.--The members of the board shall not be compensated for their service as members of the board but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties as members of the board.(f) Fiduciary relationship.--The members of the board and the professional personnel of the board shall stand in a fiduciary relationship with the authority as to the money in the accounts of the authority and investments of the authority.(g) Standard of care.--The members of the board in performance of their duties under this chapter shall exercise the standard of care required by 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 73 (relating to municipalities investments).20250SB0323PN1620 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Liability.--Members of the board shall not be personally liable on any obligations of the authority, including bonds of the authority.(i) Initial appointment and vacancy.--Appointing authorities shall appoint initial members to the board within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member within 30 days of the vacancy. If the appointing authority does not make an appointment during the 30-day period, the remainder of the board may select a replacement member to serve in the role, subject to replacement by the authorized appointing authority.§ 1713. Powers.(a) Powers.--The authority may do all of the following:(1) Adopt bylaws and guidelines.(2) Sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, interplead, complain and defend in any court.(3) Adopt, use and alter a corporate seal.(4) Establish accounts necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.(5) Employ an executive director, if necessary.(6) Retain attorneys, accountants, auditors and financial experts to render services and engage the services of other advisors, consultants and agents as necessary. For the purposes of this paragraph, the authority shall be considered an independent agency for purposes of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(7) Pay or satisfy obligations of the authority.(8) Contract and execute instruments, including 20250SB0323PN1620 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financing agreements, loan agreements, letter of credit agreements, liquidity agreements, guarantees, sureties, mortgages, standby loan commitments and contracts of insurance, which are necessary or appropriate for carrying on the business of the authority. Power under this paragraph includes the ability to make and execute contracts for the servicing of loans and mortgages acquired by the authority.(9) Borrow money, issue bonds, obtain lines and letters of credit and incur debt.(10) Contract with an administrator to operate the authority.(11) Use or pledge an account for a special purpose, including debt service reserves and other reserves, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the authority's powers and duties.(12) Negotiate modifications or alterations to financing agreements, mortgages or security interests.(13) Foreclose on a mortgage or security interest in default.(14) Commence any action necessary to protect or enforce any right conferred upon the authority by law, mortgage, security agreement, contract or other agreement.(15) Bid for or purchase property which was the subject of a mortgage or security interest at a foreclosure or other sale and acquire and take possession of that property.(16) Impose and collect fees and charges in connection with loan commitments and servicing, including reimbursement of costs of financing.(17) Acquire, accept, purchase, receive, collect, hold, convey and invest money, fees and property, whether tangible 20250SB0323PN1620 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or intangible, from all sources, directly or by assignment, pledge or otherwise.(18) Acquire, buy, sell, lease, encumber, mortgage, hypothecate, pledge, assign, transfer, convey or dispose of any property, whether tangible or intangible, including the authority's property or interest in projects, mortgages, deeds of trust, indentures of mortgage or trust, leases, purchase or sale or other financing agreements, or similar instruments, bonds, notes and security interests in property or contracts entered into or acquired in connection with bonds.(19) Acquire and sell loans, mortgages and security interests at public or private sale and make loans to, lease property from or to or enter into any other kind of an agreement with a participant or other entity, in connection with financing or refinancing a project.(20) Employ or appoint agents, employees, finance professionals and special advisors.(21) Apply for an allocation of volume cap, tax credit, subsidy, grant, loan, credit enhancement or any other Federal, State or local program in connection with the financing of a project.(22) Establish and collect fees and administrative expenses from participants that benefit from the authority's services or services provided by an outside entity.(23) Develop, adopt and implement binding policies or guidelines assuring that all persons are accorded equal opportunity in employment and contracting associated with the authority. This paragraph includes the authority's contractors, subcontractors, assignees, lessees, agents, 20250SB0323PN1620 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vendors and suppliers.(24) Exercise rights provided by law for the benefit or protection of the authority or obligees of the authority.(25) Invest money of the authority not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of bonds, as the board determines, subject to any agreement with bondholders stated in the authorizing resolution providing for the issuance of bonds.(26) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the authority's programs, property and other assets.(27) Promulgate regulations and adopt guidelines and statements of policy containing restrictions as the authority may deem necessary and appropriate to effectuate the public purposes of this chapter.(28) Negotiate and enter into interest rate exchange agreements, interest rate cap agreements, collar agreements, corridor agreements, ceiling agreements, floor agreements, forward agreements, float agreements and other similar arrangements which, in the judgment of the authority, will assist the authority in managing the interest costs of the authority.(29) Enter into agreements with applicants and project users providing for any of the following:(i) Loan, rental or purchase price payments or other payments, sufficient to amortize the principal, interest and premium, if any, of bonds and contractual obligations of the authority incurred to provide money to pay the costs of the projects being financed.(ii) The applicants or project users to pay or cause to be paid all other costs of acquiring, constructing, 20250SB0323PN1620 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintaining and operating the projects being financed.(iii) Conveyance with or without consideration of any part or all of a project being financed to the project user or applicant on or before payment of all bonds and contractual obligations of the authority incurred with respect to the project.(iv) Other matters as determined by the authority.(30) Implement a program to communicate business opportunities to a range of entities, including businesses owned or operated by veterans, members of underrepresented demographic groups and small businesses located in this Commonwealth.(31) Carry out appropriate acts necessary or convenient to:(i) effectuate the purposes of this chapter; or(ii) exercise the powers specified in this subsection, including any act reasonably implied from those powers.(b) Duties.--The authority shall finance projects in one or more states or territories of the United States by issuing conduit revenue bonds.SUBCHAPTER CBONDSSec.1721. Bonds issuance.1722. Commonwealth taxation.1723. Federal taxation.1724. Validity of bonds and limitation on actions.1725. Provisions of bonds and trust agreements.1726. Validity of pledge.20250SB0323PN1620 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1727. Commonwealth pledges.1728. Bonds to be legal investments.1729. Rights and remedies of obligees.1730. Benefits to Commonwealth.§ 1721. Bonds issuance.(a) Authorization.--The authority may engage in conduit financing to issue limited obligation revenue bonds and other types of limited obligation revenue financing. Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be in the name of the authority.(b) Taxability.--The authority may issue tax-exempt bonds and taxable bonds to fund projects.(c) Authorization requirements.--(1) Bonds of the authority shall be authorized by a resolution of the board.(2) The resolution of the board authorizing an issuance of bonds or the documents approved by the resolution shall provide that the bonds:(i) be of a series;(ii) bear a date or dates;(iii) bear or accrue interest at any rate or rates, whether fixed or variable;(iv) be in denominations;(v) be in any form, either coupon or fully registered without coupons or in certificated or book-entry-only form;(vi) carry registration, exchangeability and interchangeability privileges;(vii) be payable in any medium of payment and at any place or places;(viii) mature on a date or dates not to exceed 50 20250SB0323PN1620 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years from the bonds' original issue date; and(ix) be subject to terms of redemption or tender, if any.(3) Bonds shall be signed by or shall bear the facsimile signature of the officer designated by the board.(4) Interest coupons shall be attached to coupon bonds and shall bear the facsimile signature of the officer designated by the board.(5) Bonds may be authenticated by an authenticating agent, fiscal agent or trustee.(6) Bonds may be issued and delivered notwithstanding that the officer signing the bonds or whose facsimile signature is on a coupon has ceased to be the officer at the time when bonds are actually delivered.(7) The proceeds of a bond issued under this section may be used for one or more projects located in this Commonwealth or one or more states or territories of the United States.(8) The authority may not issue bonds to finance a capital improvement project unless the political subdivision within which the project is to be located approves the financing of the project.(d) No debt or liability of the Commonwealth.--(1) Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be a debt or liability of the Commonwealth and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Commonwealth.(2) Bonds shall be payable solely from money received by the authority from revenues derived from the operation of the project or accounts pledged or available for repayment of the bonds as authorized in this chapter, which may include any of 20250SB0323PN1620 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the following:(i) The proceeds of bonds.(ii) Money appropriated to the authority for repayment as authorized in this chapter.(3) All bonds shall contain on their faces statements to the effect that:(i) the authority is obligated to pay the principal of or the interest on the bonds only from the authority's revenues, receipts or money pledged or available for their payment as authorized under this chapter;(ii) neither the Commonwealth nor any political subdivision is obligated to pay the principal of or interest on the bonds; and(iii) neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.(4) THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR DEFAULTS OR FAILURES ASSOCIATED WITH PROJECTS, ISSUERS, OBLIGORS OR RELATED ENTITIES, WHETHER LOCATED WITHIN OR OUTSIDE THIS COMMONWEALTH.(e) Sale.--Bonds may be sold at public sale, invited sale or private sale for the price or prices the authority determines.(f) Interim receipts.--Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of the bonds and shall contain the terms and conditions established by the authority.(g) Negotiable instruments.--Bonds of the authority shall have the qualities of negotiable instruments under 13 Pa.C.S. (relating to commercial code).20250SB0323PN1620 - 20 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Use.--The authority may use the proceeds of bonds for any of the following:(1) Making loans, grants or guarantees.(2) Purchasing loans, mortgages, security interests or loan participations.(3) Paying expenses in connection with activity under paragraphs (1) and (2), including administrative costs of the authority and the administrator.(4) Paying expenses of authorizing and issuing the bonds.(5) Paying principal, redemption or purchase price and interest on bonds.(6) Funding reserves.(7) Any other purpose deemed necessary or appropriate by the authority.(i) Refunding.--Subject to provisions of this chapter and the terms of bonds or other contractual obligations issued in accordance with this chapter, the authority may refund any outstanding debt of the authority whether the debt represents principal or interest, in whole or in part, at any time. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "refund" and its variations means the issuance and sale of obligations the proceeds of which are used or are to be used for the payment or redemption of outstanding obligations upon or prior to maturity.§ 1722. Commonwealth taxation.(a) Purposes.--The effectuation of the purposes of the authority is for the benefit of the public in this Commonwealth and nationally, for the increase of commerce and prosperity and for the improvement of health, safety, welfare and living conditions.20250SB0323PN1620 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) No tax liability.--The authority, as a public instrumentality of the Commonwealth performing essential governmental functions, is not required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any property located in this Commonwealth acquired or used or permitted to be used by the authority for the authority's purposes.(c) Bonds.--The transfer and the income from bonds issued by the authority for projects, including profit made on their sale, are not subject to State and local taxation within this Commonwealth. The exclusion to tax under this subsection shall not extend to gift, estate, succession or inheritance taxes or any other taxes not levied directly on the bonds, the bonds' transfers, the income from the bonds or the realization of profits on the bonds' sales.§ 1723. Federal taxation.(a) Allocation.--If the bonds issued by the authority for a project are tax-exempt bonds for which Federal law requires an allocation, the authority may apply for the allocation upon receipt of a written request by the board. An allocation must be issued by the appropriate allocating entity prior to the date of issuance of the bonds.(b) Approval.--If gubernatorial approval is required by Federal or State law, the Governor may approve the issuance of bonds by the authority upon receipt of written request for approval from the board. The written request must state all of the following:(1) The authority and the local jurisdiction, if applicable, has conducted a public hearing, with appropriate public notice, concerning the purposes for which the bonds are to be issued.20250SB0323PN1620 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A description of the project or projects to be financed.(3) A description of the method of financing the project or projects.(4) A summary of the comments made and questions posed at the public hearing.§ 1724. Validity of bonds and limitation on actions.(a) Presumption.--Bonds issued by the authority to accomplish the public purposes of this chapter shall be conclusively deemed in any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of the bonds or their security to have been issued for the public purposes of this chapter.(b) Estoppel.--After issuance, bonds shall be conclusively presumed to be fully authorized and issued under the laws of this Commonwealth, and any person shall be estopped from questioning their validity, sale, execution or delivery by the authority.§ 1725. Provisions of bonds and trust agreements.A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or any trust agreement approved in or by a resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain provisions which do any of the following:(1) Secure the bonds.(2) Covenant against any of the following:(i) Pledging or granting a security interest in any part of the authority's revenues or any part of the authority's property to which its right or title exists or which may later come into existence.(ii) Permitting or suffering any lien on all or any part of its revenues or property.20250SB0323PN1620 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Extending the time for the payment of bonds or interest.(3) Covenant with respect to limiting the authority's right to sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of bonds or notes of governmental units, loan agreements or other property.(4) Covenant relating to any of the following:(i) Additional bonds to be issued.(ii) Limitations on additional bonds.(iii) Terms and conditions of additional bonds.(iv) Custody, application, investment and disposition of proceeds of bonds.(v) Incurring of other debts or obligations by the authority.(vi) Payment of principal of or interest on bonds.(vii) Sources and methods of payment.(viii) Rank or priority of bonds with respect to liens or security interests.(ix) Redemption, purchase and tender of bonds by the authority or the bondholders and the privilege of exchange of the bonds for other bonds.(x) Use, investment and disposition of the money held in special funds, accounts or reserves.(xi) Use of any or all of the authority's real or personal property.(xii) Warrant of title to the authority's real or personal property.(5) Provide for any of the following:(i) Replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated bonds.(ii) Maintenance of the authority's real and 20250SB0323PN1620 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 personal property.(iii) Replacement of the authority's real and personal property.(iv) Insurance to be carried on the authority's real and personal property and the use and disposition of the insurance proceeds.(v) Rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach of a covenant, condition or obligation.(6) Create or authorize the creation of special funds or accounts to be held in trust or otherwise for the benefit of bondholders or of reserves for debt service or other purposes.(7) Provide for obtaining letters of credit, bond insurance and other facilities for credit enhancement and liquidity.(8) Prescribe any of the following:(i) Procedure by which the terms of a contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated.(ii) Percentage of the principal amount of bonds the holders of which must consent to the amendment or abrogation of any contract.(iii) Manner in which the consent under subparagraph (ii) may be given.(9) Prescribe any of the following:(i) Events of default.(ii) Terms and conditions upon which the bonds become or may be declared due and payable before stated maturity following an event of default.(iii) Terms and conditions upon which the declaration of default and its consequence may be waived.20250SB0323PN1620 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) Pay the costs or expenses incident to any of the following:(i) The enforcement of the bonds.(ii) The provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.(iii) The trust agreement securing the bonds.(iv) A covenant or agreement of the authority with the holders of the bonds or other obligees of the authority.(11) Vest in a trustee, within or outside this Commonwealth, any property, rights, powers and duties in trust, including rights with respect to the sale or other disposition of notes and bonds, of governmental units and other instruments and security pledged under a resolution or trust agreement for the benefit of bondholders and rights, by suit or action, to foreclose a mortgage pledged under a resolution or trust indenture for the benefit of bondholders.(12) Limit the rights, powers and duties of a trustee and the right of bondholders to appoint a trustee.(13) Establish the terms and conditions upon which a trustee or the bondholders may enforce a covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds.(14) Exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted in this chapter.(15) Make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized by this chapter.(16) Do or refrain from doing any other act to better secure the bonds of the authority or make bonds of the authority more marketable.§ 1726. Validity of pledge.20250SB0323PN1620 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A pledge or grant of a security interest in revenues or instruments made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues, receipts, money or other property or instruments pledged and later received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge or security interest without any physical delivery of the property pledged or further act. The lien of the pledge or security interest shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the lien, pledge or security interest. No instrument by which a pledge or security interest is created, evidenced or noticed need be recorded or filed to perfect the pledge or security interest except in the records of the authority.§ 1727. Commonwealth pledges.(a) Bondholders.--The Commonwealth pledges to and agrees with each obligee of the authority that the Commonwealth will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority or otherwise created by this chapter in any manner inconsistent with the obligations of the authority to the obligees of the authority until all bonds at any time issued, together with the interest on the bonds, are fully paid and discharged.(b) Lessees.--The Commonwealth pledges and agrees with any person that, as owner of property which is leased or subleased to or from the authority, the Commonwealth will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority or otherwise created by this chapter in any manner which impairs the obligations of the authority until all the obligations of the authority under the lease or sublease are fully met and discharged.20250SB0323PN1620 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1728. Bonds to be legal investments.(a) Investments.--Bonds issued under this chapter are made securities in which all of the following may properly and legally invest money, including capital, deposits or other money in their control or belonging to them:(1) Government agencies.(2) Insurance companies.(3) Trust companies.(4) Banking associations, banking corporations and savings banks.(5) Investment companies.(6) Executors, trustees and other fiduciaries.(7) Trustees of any retirement, pension or annuity fund or system of the Commonwealth.(b) Deposits.--Bonds issued by the authority are made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by a government agency for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth are authorized by law.§ 1729. Rights and remedies of obligees.The rights and remedies conferred upon or granted to obligees of the authority under this chapter shall be in addition to and not in limitation of rights and remedies lawfully granted to the obligees of the authority by resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or by any trust agreement or other agreement under which the bonds may be issued or secured.§ 1730. Benefits to Commonwealth.The authority shall pay, on an annual basis, to the Commonwealth, the money generated by the authority after the payment of all costs and expenses to operate the authority, 20250SB0323PN1620 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including payments to the administrator and the retention of money to maintain reasonable reserves as determined by the board.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0323PN1620 - 29 - 1234